California, session 20252026, AB1647.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 707.3 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:707.3. (a) Testimony a minor gives at a transfer hearing conducted pursuant to Section 707, or statements the minor makes to the minor’s probation officer, officer for purposes of preparing a report for a transfer hearing, shall not be used against the minor in subsequent juvenile proceedings or subsequent criminal proceedings for the offense. This section does not prohibit the minor’s statements made to the minor’s probation officer for purposes of preparing a report for a transfer hearing or at a transfer hearing from being used at sentencing.(b) This section shall not be construed to restrict, expand, alter, or modify the decision in Bryan v. Superior Court, 7 Cal. 3d 575 (1972) Court (1972) 7 Cal.3d 575 or Ramona R. v. Superior Court, 37 Cal.3d 802 (1985). Court (1985) 37 Cal.3d 802. This section is declaratory of existing law.